New Jersey, session 222, S344.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.2C:33-7 is amended to read as follows: a. (1)  A person[,] who, having no legal privilege to do so, [purposely or] recklessly obstructs any highway or other public passage whether alone or with others, commits a [petty] disorderly persons offense.   ["Obstructs" means renders impassable without unreasonable inconvenience or hazard.]  No person shall be deemed guilty of recklessly obstructing in violation of this subsection solely because of a gathering of persons to hear him speak or otherwise communicate, or solely because of being a member of such a gathering. (2)  A person who, having no legal privilege to do so, purposely obstructs, delays, or affects commerce or the movement of any article or commodity in commerce by obstructing any highway or other public passage whether alone or with others, commits a crime of the fourth degree. For purposes of this section: Obstructs" means renders impassable without unreasonable inconvenience or hazard. b.  A person in a gathering commits a [petty] disorderly persons offense if he refuses to obey a reasonable official request or order to move: (1) To prevent obstruction of a highway or other public passage;  or (2) To maintain public safety by dispersing those gathered in dangerous proximity to a fire or other hazard. An order to move, addressed to a person whose speech or other lawful behavior attracts an obstructing audience, shall not be deemed reasonable if the obstruction can be readily remedied by police control of the size or location of the gathering. (cf: N.J.S.2C:33-7) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.